Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-834
Critical procurements; review; report; confidential; unauthorized public disclosure, penalty.

(1) The Department of Administrative Services shall conduct a review of critical procurements purchased or supplied through a state supply chain or state vendor supply chain and produce a report, which shall be electronically submitted using a secure method to the Governor by November 1, 2024.

(2) The report shall:

(a) Summarize the critical procurements produced in or by a foreign adversary, a state-owned enterprise of a foreign adversary, a company domiciled within a foreign adversary, or a company owned by a company domiciled within a foreign adversary;

(b) Summarize the critical procurements manufactured in countries or by companies at risk of disruption in the event of a Pacific conflict;

(c) Summarize the critical procurements sourced from any country or company which utilizes Pacific supply chain processes at risk of disruption in the event of a Pacific conflict;

(d) Assess the difficulty in identifying potential alternative sourcing, if relevant; and

(e) Assess the level of risk to the State of Nebraska associated with such a disruption in sourcing for each procurement that is threatened in the event of a Pacific conflict.

(3) The Department of Administrative Services may contract with a private consultant to assist with the review and report required under this section, and such contract need not be competitively bid.

(4) Information contained in the report required under this section is confidential. Unauthorized public disclosure of such confidential information is a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 2024, LB1300, § 4.
April 17, 2024